Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.140

Department review.

By November 15, 2012, the department, in consultation with the commission and the dental hygiene examining committee, shall conduct a review of the effectiveness of the creation of the dental assistant and expanded function dental auxiliary professions as related to:

(1) Increasing professional standards in dental practices;

(2) Increasing efficiency in dental practices and community health clinics;

(3) Promoting career ladders in the dental professions; and

(4) Recommendations for expanding or contracting the practice of dental assistants and expanded function dental auxiliaries.

[ 2007 c 269 s 18.]